Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.020

Grounds for issuance of writ—Time of issuance of prejudgment writs.

(1) The clerks of the superior courts and district courts of this state may issue writs of garnishment returnable to their respective courts for the benefit of a judgment creditor who has a judgment wholly or partially unsatisfied in the court from which the garnishment is sought.

(2) Writs of garnishment may be issued in district court with like effect by the attorney of record for the judgment creditor, and the form of writ shall be substantially the same as when issued by the court except that it shall be subscribed only by the signature of such attorney.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 6.27.040 and 6.27.330, the superior courts and district courts of this state may issue prejudgment writs of garnishment to a plaintiff at the time of commencement of an action or at any time afterward, subject to the requirements of chapter 6.26 RCW.

[ 2003 c 222 s 1; 1987 c 442 s 1002; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 1. Formerly RCW 7.33.010.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 64.